Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1226
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 482.